Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1343
Effect of recognition of foreign-country judgment.

If the court in a proceeding under section 25-1342 finds that the foreign-country judgment is entitled to recognition under the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act then, to the extent that the foreign-country judgment grants or denies recovery of a sum of money, the foreign-country judgment is:

(1) conclusive between the parties to the same extent as the judgment of a sister state entitled to full faith and credit in this state would be conclusive; and

(2) enforceable in the same manner and to the same extent as a judgment rendered in this state.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 7.